Maryland, session 2026, HB0619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
SUBTITLE 3A. INTERSTATE PODIATRIC MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT.
16–3A–01.
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
IN ORDER TO STRENGTHEN ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE, AND IN RECOGNITION
OF THE ADVANCES IN THE DELIVERY IN HEALTH CARE, THE MEMBER STATES OF THE
INTERSTATE PODIATRIC MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT HAVE ALLIED IN COMMON
PURPOSE TO DEVELOP A COMPREHENSIVE PROCESS THAT COMPLEMENTS THE
EXISTING LICENSING AND REGULATORY AUTHORITY OF STATE PODIATRIC MEDICAL
BOARDS AND PROVIDES A STREAMLINED PROCESS THAT ALLOWS PODIATRISTS TO
BECOME LICENSED IN MULTIPLE STATES, THEREBY ENHANCING THE PORTABILITY
OF A PODIATRIC MEDICAL LICENSE AND ENSURING THE SAFETY OF PATIENTS. THE
COMPACT CREATES ANOTHER PATHWAY FOR LICENSURE AND DOES NOT
OTHERWISE CHANGE A STATE’S EXISTING PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT.
THE COMPACT ALSO ADOPTS THE PREVAILING STANDARD FOR LICENSURE AND
AFFIRMS THAT THE PRACTICE OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE OCCURS WHERE THE
PATIENT IS LOCATED AT THE TIME OF THE PODIATRIST–PATIENT ENCOUNTER, AND
– 1 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THEREFORE, REQUIRES THE PODIATRIST TO BE UNDER THE JURISDICTION OF THE
STATE PODIATRIC MEDICAL BOARD WHERE THE PATIENT IS LOCATED. STATE
PODIATRIC MEDICAL BOARDS THAT PARTICIPATE IN THE COMPACT RETAIN THE
JURISDICTION TO IMPOSE AN ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A LICENSE TO PRACTICE
PODIATRIC MEDICINE IN THAT STATE ISSUED TO A PODIATRIST THROUGH THE
PROCEDURES IN THE COMPACT.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
IN THIS COMPACT:
(A) “BYLAWS” MEANS THOSE BYLAWS ESTABLISHED BY THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION PURSUANT TO SECTION 11.
(B) “COMMISSIONER” MEANS THE VOTING REPRESENTATIVE APPOINTED
BY EACH MEMBER BOARD PURSUANT TO SECTION 11.
(C) “CONVICTION” MEANS A FINDING BY A COURT THAT AN INDIVIDUAL IS
GUILTY OF A CRIMINAL OFFENSE THROUGH ADJUDICATION, OR ENTRY OF A PLEA
OF GUILT OR NO CONTEST TO THE CHARGE BY THE OFFENDER. EVIDENCE OF AN
ENTRY OF CONVICTION OF A CRIMINAL OFFENSE BY THE COURT SHALL BE
CONSIDERED FINAL FOR PURPOSES OF DISCIPLINARY ACTION BY A MEMBER BOARD.
(D) “EXPEDITED LICENSE” MEANS A FULL UNRESTRICTED PODIATRIC
MEDICAL LICENSE GRANTED BY A MEMBER STATE TO AN ELIGIBLE PODIATRIST
THROUGH THE PROCESS SET FORTH IN THE COMPACT.
(E) “CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK” MEANS THAT THE MEMBER BOARD IS
AUTHORIZED TO OBTAIN A FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION BIOMETRIC
BASED FEDERAL CRIMINAL RECORDS CHECK INFORMATION REPORT FROM THE
AUTHORIZED STATE AGENCY FOR THE EXCLUSIVE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING
ELIGIBILITY FOR CERTIFICATION OF QUALIFICATION THAT WOULD ALLOW FOR AN
EXPEDITED LICENSE.
(F) “FEDERAL CRIMINAL RECORDS CHECK INFORMATION” MEANS ANY
INFORMATION OBTAINED BY A MEMBER BOARD FROM THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION RELATING TO A FEDERAL CRIMINAL RECORDS CHECK PERFORMED
BY A MEMBER BOARD UNDER PUBLIC LAW 92–544.
(G) “INTERSTATE COMMISSION” MEANS THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 11.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
(H) “LICENSE” MEANS AUTHORIZATION BY A MEMBER STATE FOR A
PODIATRIST TO ENGAGE IN THE PRACTICE OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE, WHICH WOULD
BE UNLAWFUL WITHOUT AUTHORIZATION.
(I) “PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT” MEANS LAWS AND
REGULATIONS GOVERNING THE PRACTICE OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE WITHIN A
MEMBER STATE.
(J) “MEMBER BOARD” MEANS A STATE AGENCY IN A MEMBER STATE THAT
ACTS IN THE SOVEREIGN INTEREST OF THE STATE BY PROTECTING THE PUBLIC
THROUGH LICENSURE, REGULATION, AND EDUCATION OF PODIATRISTS AS
DIRECTED BY THE STATE GOVERNMENT.
(K) “MEMBER STATE” MEANS A STATE WHICH HAS ENACTED THE COMPACT.
(L) “PRACTICE OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE” MEANS THAT CLINICAL
PREVENTION, DIAGNOSIS, OR TREATMENT OF HUMAN DISEASE, INJURY, OR
CONDITION REQUIRING A PODIATRIST TO OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN A LICENSE IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THE PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF A MEMBER STATE.
(M) “PODIATRIST” MEANS ANY PERSON WHO:
(1) IS A GRADUATE OF A PODIATRIC MEDICAL SCHOOL ACCREDITED
BY THE COUNCIL OF PODIATRIC MEDICAL EDUCATION;
(2) PASSED PARTS I, II, AND III (PMLEXIS) OF THE NATIONAL
BOARD OF PODIATRIC MEDICAL EXAMINERS’ (NBPME) / AMERICAN PODIATRIC
MEDICAL LICENSING EXAMINATION (APMLE), OR THEIR NBPME/APMLE
RECOGNIZED REPLACEMENT EXAMINATIONS;
(3) SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES A PODIATRIC RESIDENCY PROGRAM
APPROVED BY THE COUNCIL ON PODIATRIC MEDICAL EDUCATION;
(4) HOLDS SPECIALTY CERTIFICATION FROM A SPECIALTY BOARD
RECOGNIZED BY THE COUNCIL ON PODIATRIC MEDICAL EDUCATION;
(5) POSSESSES A FULL AND UNRESTRICTED LICENSE TO ENGAGE IN
THE PRACTICE OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE ISSUED BY A MEMBER BOARD;
(6) HAS NEVER BEEN CONVICTED, RECEIVED ADJUDICATION,
DEFERRED ADJUDICATION, COMMUNITY SUPERVISION, OR DEFERRED DISPOSITION
FOR ANY OFFENSE BY A COURT OF APPROPRIATE JURISDICTION;
– 3 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) HAS NEVER HELD A LICENSE AUTHORIZING THE PRACTICE OF
PODIATRIC MEDICINE SUBJECTED TO DISCIPLINE BY A LICENSING AGENCY IN ANY
STATE, FEDERAL, OR FOREIGN JURISDICTION, EXCLUDING ANY ACTION RELATED TO
THE NON–PAYMENT OF FEES RELATED TO A LICENSE;
(8) HAS NEVER HAD A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE LICENSE OR PERMIT
SUSPENDED OR REVOKED BY A STATE OR THE UNITED STATES DRUG
ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION OR VOLUNTARILY SURRENDERED SUCH LICENSE
AFTER NOTIFICATION OF INVESTIGATION; AND
(9) IS NOT UNDER ACTIVE INVESTIGATION BY A LICENSING AGENCY
OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY IN ANY STATE, FEDERAL OR FOREIGN
JURISDICTION.
(N) “OFFENSE” MEANS A FELONY, GROSS MISDEMEANOR, OR A
MISDEMEANOR RELATED TO THE PRACTICE OF PODIATRY.
(O) “RULE” MEANS A WRITTEN STATEMENT BY THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION PROMULGATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12 OF THE COMPACT THAT IS
OF GENERAL APPLICABILITY, IMPLEMENTS, INTERPRETS, OR PRESCRIBES A POLICY
OR PROVISION OF THE COMPACT, OR AN ORGANIZATIONAL, PROCEDURAL, OR
PRACTICE REQUIREMENT OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION, AND HAS THE FORCE
AND EFFECT OF STATUTORY LAW IN A MEMBER STATE, AND INCLUDES THE
AMENDMENT, REPEAL, OR SUSPENSION OF AN EXISTING RULE.
(P) “STATE” MEANS ANY STATE, COMMONWEALTH, DISTRICT, OR
TERRITORY OF THE UNITED STATES.
(Q) “STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE” MEANS A MEMBER STATE WHERE A
PODIATRIST HOLDS A LICENSE TO PRACTICE PODIATRIC MEDICINE AND THAT HAS
BEEN DESIGNATED BY SUCH A PODIATRIST FOR PURPOSES OF REGISTRATION AND
PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
SECTION 3. ELIGIBILITY
(A) A PODIATRIST MUST MEET THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 2(M) TO RECEIVE AN EXPEDITED LICENSURE UNDER THE
TERMS AND PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT.
(B) A PODIATRIST WHO DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION
2(M) MAY OBTAIN A LICENSE TO PRACTICE PODIATRIC MEDICINE IN A MEMBER
STATE IF THE INDIVIDUAL COMPLIES WITH ALL LAWS AND REQUIREMENTS, OTHER
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
THAN THE COMPACT, RELATING TO THE ISSUANCE OF A LICENSE TO PRACTICE
PODIATRIC MEDICINE IN THAT STATE.
SECTION 4. DESIGNATION OF STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE
(A) A PODIATRIST SHALL DESIGNATE A MEMBER STATE AS THE STATE OF
PRINCIPAL LICENSE FOR PURPOSES OF REGISTRATION FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE
THROUGH THE COMPACT IF THE PODIATRIST POSSESSES A FULL AND
UNRESTRICTED LICENSE TO PRACTICE PODIATRIC MEDICINE IN THAT STATE, AND
THE STATE IS:
(1) THE STATE OF PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE FOR THE PODIATRIST;
(2) THE STATE WHERE AT LEAST 25% OF THE PRACTICE OF
PODIATRIC MEDICINE OCCURS;
(3) THE LOCATION OF THE PODIATRIST’S EMPLOYER; OR
(4) IF NO STATE QUALIFIES UNDER SUBSECTION (1), SUBSECTION (2),
OR SUBSECTION (3), THE STATE DESIGNATED AS STATE OF RESIDENCE FOR
PURPOSE OF FEDERAL INCOME TAX.
(B) A PODIATRIST MAY REDESIGNATE A MEMBER STATE AS STATE OF
PRINCIPAL LICENSE AT ANY TIME, AS LONG AS THE STATE MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A).
(C) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED TO DEVELOP RULES TO
FACILITATE REDESIGNATION OF ANOTHER MEMBER STATE AS THE STATE OF
PRINCIPAL LICENSE.
SECTION 5. APPLICATION AND ISSUANCE OF EXPEDITED
LICENSURE
(A) A PODIATRIST SEEKING LICENSURE THROUGH THE COMPACT SHALL
FILE AN APPLICATION FOR AN EXPEDITED LICENSE WITH THE MEMBER BOARD OF
THE STATE SELECTED BY THE PODIATRIST AS THE STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE.
(B) UPON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR AN EXPEDITED LICENSE, THE
MEMBER BOARD WITHIN THE STATE SELECTED AS THE STATE OF PRINCIPAL
LICENSE SHALL EVALUATE WHETHER THE PODIATRIST IS ELIGIBLE FOR EXPEDITED
LICENSURE AND ISSUE A LETTER OF QUALIFICATION, VERIFYING OR DENYING THE
PODIATRIST’S ELIGIBILITY TO, AND IN THE MANNER ESTABLISHED THROUGH RULE
BY, THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
– 5 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) STATIC QUALIFICATION, WHICH INCLUDES VERIFICATION OF
PODIATRIC MEDICAL EDUCATION, PODIATRIC GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION,
RESULTS OF ANY PODIATRIC MEDICAL LICENSING EXAMINATION, AND OTHER
QUALIFICATIONS AS DETERMINED BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION THROUGH
RULE, MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO ADDITIONAL PRIMARY SOURCE VERIFICATION
WHERE THE PRIMARY SOURCE WAS ALREADY VERIFIED BY THE STATE OF PRINCIPAL
LICENSE.
(2) THE MEMBER BOARD WITHIN THE STATE SELECTED AS THE STATE
OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE SHALL, IN THE COURSE OF VERIFYING ELIGIBILITY,
PERFORM A CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK OF AN APPLICANT, INCLUDING THE
USE OF RESULTS OF FINGERPRINT OR OTHER BIOMETRIC DATA CHECKS COMPLIANT
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION WITH THE
EXCEPTION OF FEDERAL EMPLOYEES WHO HAVE A SUITABILITY DETERMINATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH 5 C.F.R. § 731.202.
(I) COMMUNICATION BETWEEN A MEMBER BOARD AND THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION AND COMMUNICATION BETWEEN MEMBER BOARDS
REGARDING THE VERIFICATION OF ELIGIBILITY IN SECTION (3) THROUGH THE
COMPACT MAY NOT INCLUDE ANY INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION RELATING TO A FEDERAL CRIMINAL RECORDS CHECK
PERFORMED BY A MEMBER BOARD UNDER PUBLIC LAW 92–544, INCLUDING
FEDERAL CRIMINAL RECORDS CHECK INFORMATION.
(II) FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION INFORMATION
OBTAINED BY A MEMBER BOARD MAY NOT BE SHARED WITH THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION.
(3) APPEAL OF THE DETERMINATION OF ELIGIBILITY SHALL BE MADE
TO THE MEMBER STATE WHERE THE APPLICATION WAS FILED AND SHALL BE
SUBJECT TO THE LAW OF THAT STATE.
(C) UPON VERIFICATION IN SUBSECTION (B), A PODIATRIST ELIGIBLE FOR
AN EXPEDITED LICENSE SHALL COMPLETE THE REGISTRATION PROCESS
ESTABLISHED BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION TO RECEIVE A LICENSE IN A
MEMBER STATE SELECTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (A), INCLUDING THE
PAYMENT OF ANY APPLICABLE FEES.
(D) AFTER RECEIVING VERIFICATION OF ELIGIBILITY UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) AND ANY FEES UNDER SUBSECTION (C), A MEMBER BOARD SHALL ISSUE AN
EXPEDITED LICENSE TO THE PODIATRIST. THIS LICENSE SHALL AUTHORIZE THE
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
PODIATRIST TO PRACTICE PODIATRIC MEDICINE IN THE ISSUING STATE
CONSISTENT WITH THE PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT AND ALL APPLIABLE
LAWS AND REGULATIONS OF THE ISSUING MEMBER BOARD AND MEMBER STATE.
(E) AN EXPEDITED LICENSE SHALL BE VALID FOR A PERIOD CONSISTENT
WITH THE LICENSURE PERIOD IN THE MEMBER STATE AND IN THE SAME MANNER AS
REQUIRED FOR OTHER PODIATRISTS HOLDING A FULL AND UNRESTRICTED LICENSE
WITHIN THE MEMBER STATE.
(F) AN EXPEDITED LICENSE OBTAINED THROUGH THE COMPACT SHALL BE
TERMINATED IF A PODIATRIST FAILS TO MAINTAIN A LICENSE IN THE STATE OF
PRINCIPAL LICENSURE FOR A NON–DISCIPLINARY REASON, WITHOUT
REDESIGNATION OF A NEW STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSURE.
(G) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED TO DEVELOP RULES
REGARDING THE APPLICATION PROCESS, INCLUDING PAYMENT OF ANY APPLICABLE
FEES, AND THE REPORTING OF THE ISSUANCE OF AN EXPEDITED LICENSE BY A
MEMBER BOARD TO THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
SECTION 6. FEES FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE
(A) A MEMBER STATE ISSUING AN EXPEDITED LICENSE AUTHORIZING THE
PRACTICE OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE IN THAT STATE MAY IMPOSE A FEE FOR A
LICENSE ISSUED OR RENEWED THROUGH THE COMPACT.
(B) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED TO DEVELOP RULES
REGARDING FEES FOR EXPEDITED LICENSES.
SECTION 7. RENEWAL AND CONTINUED PARTICIPATION
(A) A PODIATRIST SEEKING TO RENEW AN EXPEDITED LICENSE GRANTED IN
A MEMBER STATE SHALL COMPLETE A RENEWAL PROCESS WITH THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION IF THE PODIATRIST:
(1) MAINTAINS A FULL AND UNRESTRICTED LICENSE IN A STATE OF
PRINCIPAL LICENSE;
(2) HAS NOT BEEN CONVICTED, RECEIVED ADJUDICATION,
DEFERRED ADJUDICATION, COMMUNITY SUPERVISION, OR DEFERRED DISPOSITION
FOR ANY OFFENSE BY A COURT OF APPROPRIATE JURISDICTION;
(3) HAS NOT HAD A LICENSE AUTHORIZING THE PRACTICE OF
PODIATRIC MEDICINE SUBJECT TO DISCIPLINE BY A LICENSING AGENCY IN ANY
– 7 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
STATE, FEDERAL, OR FOREIGN JURISDICTION, OR VOLUNTARILY SURRENDERED
SUCH LICENSE IN LIEU OF DISCIPLINE, EXCLUDING ANY ACTION RELATED TO
NON–PAYMENT OF FEES RELATED TO A LICENSE; AND
(4) HAS NOT HAD A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE LICENSE OR PERMIT
SUSPENDED OR REVOKED BY A STATE OR THE UNITED STATES DRUG
ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION OR VOLUNTARILY SURRENDERED SUCH LICENSE
OR PERMIT AFTER NOTIFICATION OF INVESTIGATION.
(B) PODIATRISTS SHALL COMPLY WITH ALL CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT OR CONTINUING MEDICAL EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR
RENEWAL OF A LICENSE ISSUED BY A MEMBER STATE.
(C) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL COLLECT ANY RENEWAL FEES
CHARGED FOR THE RENEWAL OF A LICENSE AND DISTRIBUTE THE FEES TO THE
APPLICABLE MEMBER BOARD.
(D) UPON RECEIPT OF ANY RENEWAL FEES COLLECTED IN SUBSECTION (C),
A MEMBER BOARD SHALL RENEW THE PODIATRIST’S LICENSE.
(E) PODIATRIST INFORMATION COLLECTED BY THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION DURING THE RENEWAL PROCESS WILL BE DISTRIBUTED TO ALL
MEMBER BOARDS.
(F) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED TO DEVELOP RULES TO
ADDRESS RENEWAL OF LICENSES OBTAINED THROUGH THE COMPACT.
SECTION 8. COORDINATED INFORMATION SYSTEM
(A) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A DATABASE OF ALL
PODIATRISTS LICENSED, OR WHO HAVE APPLIED FOR LICENSURE, UNDER SECTION
5.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, MEMBER BOARDS
SHALL REPORT TO THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION ANY PUBLIC ACTION OR PUBLIC
COMPLAINTS AGAINST A LICENSED PODIATRIST WHO HAS APPLIED OR RECEIVED AN
EXPEDITED LICENSE THROUGH THE COMPACT.
(C) MEMBER BOARDS SHALL REPORT DISCIPLINARY OR INVESTIGATORY
INFORMATION DETERMINED AS NECESSARY AND PROPER BY RULE OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
(D) MEMBER BOARDS MAY REPORT ANY NON–PUBLIC COMPLAINT,
DISCIPLINARY, OR INVESTIGATORY INFORMATION NOT REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION
(C) TO THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
(E) MEMBER BOARDS SHALL SHARE COMPLAINT OR DISCIPLINARY
INFORMATION ABOUT A PODIATRIST UPON REQUEST OF ANOTHER MEMBER BOARD.
(F) ALL INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION OR
DISTRIBUTED BY MEMBER BOARDS SHALL BE CONFIDENTIAL, FILED UNDER SEAL,
AND USED ONLY FOR INVESTIGATORY OR DISCIPLINARY MATTERS.
(G) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED TO DEVELOP RULES
FOR MANDATED OR DISCRETIONARY SHARING OF INFORMATION BY MEMBER
BOARDS.
SECTION 9. JOINT INVESTIGATIONS
(A) LICENSURE AND DISCIPLINARY RECORDS OF PODIATRISTS ARE
DEEMED INVESTIGATIVE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE AUTHORITY GRANTED TO A MEMBER BOARD BY ITS
RESPECTIVE PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OR OTHER APPLICABLE STATE
LAW, A MEMBER BOARD MAY PARTICIPATE WITH OTHER MEMBER BOARDS IN JOINT
INVESTIGATIONS OF PODIATRISTS LICENSED BY THE MEMBER BOARDS.
(C) A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY A MEMBER STATE AS PART OF A JOINT
INVESTIGATION SHALL BE ENFORCEABLE IN OTHER MEMBER STATES.
(D) MEMBER BOARDS MAY SHARE ANY INVESTIGATIVE, LITIGATION, OR
COMPLIANCE MATERIALS IN FURTHERANCE OF ANY JOINT OR INDIVIDUAL
INVESTIGATION INITIATED UNDER THE COMPACT.
(E) ANY MEMBER STATE MAY INVESTIGATE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED
VIOLATIONS OF THE STATUTES AUTHORIZING THE PRACTICE OF PODIATRIC
MEDICINE IN ANY OTHER MEMBER STATE IN WHICH A PODIATRIST HOLDS A LICENSE
TO PRACTICE PODIATRIC MEDICINE.
SECTION 10. DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS
(A) ANY DISCIPLINARY ACTION TAKEN BY ANY MEMBER BOARD AGAINST A
PODIATRIST LICENSED THROUGH THE COMPACT SHALL BE DEEMED
UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT WHICH MAY BE SUBJECT TO DISCIPLINE BY OTHER
MEMBER BOARDS, IN ADDITION TO ANY VIOLATION OF THE PODIATRIC MEDICAL
– 9 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
PRACTICE ACT OR REGULATIONS IN THAT STATE.
(B) IF A LICENSE GRANTED TO A PODIATRIST BY A MEMBER BOARD IN THE
STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE IS REVOKED, SURRENDERED OR RELINQUISHED IN
LIEU OF DISCIPLINE, OR SUSPENDED, THEN ALL LICENSES ISSUED TO THE
PODIATRIST BY MEMBER BOARDS SHALL AUTOMATICALLY BE PLACED, WITHOUT
FURTHER ACTION NECESSARY BY ANY MEMBER BOARD, ON THE SAME STATUS. IF
THE MEMBER BOARD OF THE STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE SUBSEQUENTLY
REINSTATES THE PODIATRIST’S LICENSE, A LICENSE ISSUED TO THE PODIATRIST BY
ANY OTHER MEMBER BOARD SHALL REMAIN ENCUMBERED UNTIL THAT RESPECTIVE
MEMBER BOARD TAKES ACTION TO REINSTATE THE LICENSE IN A MANNER
CONSISTENT WITH THE PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF THAT STATE.
(C) IF DISCIPLINARY ACTION IS TAKEN AGAINST A PODIATRIST BY A
MEMBER BOARD NOT IN A STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE, ANY OTHER MEMBER
BOARD MAY DEEM THE ACTION CONCLUSIVE AS TO MATTER OF LAW AND FACT
DECIDED, AND:
(1) IMPOSE THE SAME OR LESSER SANCTION AGAINST THE
PODIATRIST SO LONG AS SUCH SANCTIONS ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE PODIATRIC
MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF THAT STATE; OR
(2) PURSUE SEPARATE DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST THE
PODIATRIST UNDER ITS RESPECTIVE PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT,
REGARDLESS OF THE ACTION TAKEN IN OTHER MEMBER STATES.
(D) IF A LICENSE GRANTED TO A PODIATRIST BY A MEMBER BOARD IS
REVOKED, SURRENDERED OR RELINQUISHED IN LIEU OF DISCIPLINE, OR
SUSPENDED, THEN ANY LICENSE ISSUED TO A PODIATRIST BY ANY OTHER MEMBER
BOARD SHALL BE SUSPENDED, AUTOMATICALLY AND IMMEDIATELY WITHOUT
FURTHER ACTION NECESSARY BY THE OTHER MEMBER BOARD, FOR NINETY DAYS
UPON ENTRY OF THE ORDER BY THE DISCIPLINING BOARD, TO PERMIT THE MEMBER
BOARD TO INVESTIGATE THE BASIS FOR THE ACTION UNDER THE PODIATRIC
MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF THAT STATE.
(E) A MEMBER BOARD MAY TERMINATE THE AUTOMATIC PROVISION UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OR (D) OF A LICENSE IT ISSUED, IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH
THE PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF THAT STATE.
SECTION 11. INTERSTATE PODIATRIC MEDICAL LICENSURE
COMPACT COMMISSION
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
(A) THE MEMBER STATES HEREBY CREATE THE “INTERSTATE PODIATRIC
MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION”.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE INTERSTATE PODIATRIC MEDICAL LICENSURE
COMPACT, WHICH IS A DISCRETIONARY STATE FUNCTION.
(C) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL BE A BODY CORPORATE AND
JOINT AGENCY OF THE MEMBER STATES AND SHALL HAVE ALL THE
RESPONSIBILITIES, POWERS, AND DUTIES SET FORTH IN THE COMPACT, AND SUCH
ADDITIONAL POWERS AS MAY BE CONFERRED UPON IT BY A SUBSEQUENT
CONCURRENT ACTION OF THE RESPECTIVE LEGISLATURES OF THE MEMBER STATES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE COMPACT.
(D) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIST OF ONE VOTING
REPRESENTATIVE APPOINTED BY EACH MEMBER STATE WHO SHALL SERVE AS A
COMMISSIONER. A COMMISSIONER SHALL BE:
(1) A PODIATRIST APPOINTED TO A MEMBER BOARD;
(2) AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EXECUTIVE SECRETARY, OR SIMILAR
EXECUTIVE OF A MEMBER BOARD; OR
(3) A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC APPOINTED TO A MEMBER BOARD.
(E) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE EACH
CALENDAR YEAR. A PORTION OF THIS MEETING SHALL BE A BUSINESS MEETING TO
ADDRESS SUCH MATTERS AS MAY PROPERLY COME BEFORE THE COMMISSION,
INCLUDING THE ELECTION OF OFFICERS. THE CHAIRPERSON MAY CALL
ADDITIONAL MEETINGS AND SHALL CALL FOR A MEETING UPON THE REQUEST OF A
MAJORITY OF THE MEMBER STATES.
(F) THE BYLAWS MAY PROVIDE FOR MEETINGS OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION TO BE CONDUCTED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, VIA TELECONFERENCE,
VIDEO CONFERENCE, OR OTHER ELECTRONIC MEANS BY WHICH ALL PARTICIPANTS
CAN HEAR EACH OTHER SIMULTANEOUSLY AND PARTICIPATE EFFECTIVELY.
ATTENDANCE BY SUCH ELECTRONIC MEANS SHALL CONSTITUTE PRESENCE IN
PERSON AT THE MEETING.
(G) EACH COMMISSIONER PARTICIPATING AT A MEETING OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS ENTITLED TO ONE VOTE. A MAJORITY OF
COMMISSIONERS SHALL CONSTITUTE A QUORUM FOR THE TRANSACTION OF
BUSINESS, UNLESS A LARGER QUORUM IS REQUIRED BY THE BYLAWS OF THE
– 11 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
INTERSTATE COMMISSION. A COMMISSIONER MAY NOT DELEGATE A VOTE TO
ANOTHER COMMISSIONER. IN THE ABSENCE OF ITS COMMISSIONER, A MEMBER
STATE MAY DELEGATE VOTING AUTHORITY FOR A SPECIFIED MEETING TO ANOTHER
PERSON FROM THAT STATE WHO SHALL MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION
(D).
(H) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE PUBLIC NOTICE OF ALL
MEETINGS AND ALL MEETINGS SHALL BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC. THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION MAY CLOSE A MEETING, IN FULL OR IN PORTION, WHERE IT
DETERMINES BY A TWO–THIRDS VOTE OF THE COMMISSIONERS PRESENT THAT ANY
OPEN MEETING WOULD BE LIKELY TO:
(1) RELATE SOLELY TO THE INTERNAL PERSONNEL PRACTICE AND
PROCEDURES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION;
(2) DISCUSS MATTERS SPECIFICALLY EXEMPTED FROM DISCLOSURE
BY FEDERAL STATUTE;
(3) DISCUSS TRADE SECRETS, COMMERCIAL, OR FINANCIAL
INFORMATION THAT IS PRIVILEGED OR CONFIDENTIAL;
(4) INVOLVE ACCUSING A PERSON OF A CRIME, OR FORMALLY
CENSURING A PERSON;
(5) DISCUSS INFORMATION OF A PERSONAL NATURE WHERE
DISCLOSURE WOULD CONSTITUTE A CLEARLY UNWARRANTED INVASION OF
PERSONAL PRIVACY;
(6) DISCUSS INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS COMPILED FOR LAW
ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES; OR
(7) SPECIFICALLY RELATE TO THE PARTICIPATION IN A CIVIL ACTION
OR OTHER LEGAL PROCEEDING.
(I) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP MINUTES WHICH SHALL
FULLY DESCRIBE ALL MATTERS DISCUSSED IN A MEETING AND SHALL PROVIDE A
FULL AND ACCURATE SUMMARY OF ACTIONS TAKEN, INCLUDING A RECORD OF ANY
ROLL CALL VOTES.
(J) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL MAKE ITS INFORMATION AND
OFFICIAL RECORDS, TO THE EXTENT NOT OTHERWISE DESIGNATED IN THE
COMPACT OR BY ITS RULES, AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC FOR INSPECTION.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
(K) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AN EXECUTIVE
COMMITTEE, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE OFFICERS, MEMBERS, AND OTHERS AS
DETERMINED BY THE BYLAWS. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE
POWER TO ACT ON BEHALF OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION, WITH THE
EXCEPTION OF RULEMAKING, DURING PERIODS WHEN THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION IS NOT IN SESSION. WHEN ACTING ON BEHALF OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION, THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL OVERSEE THE ADMINISTRATION
OF THE COMPACT INCLUDING ENFORCEMENT AND COMPLIANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT, ITS BYLAWS AND RULES, AND OTHER SUCH DUTIES
AS NECESSARY.
(L) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH OTHER COMMITTEES
FOR GOVERNANCE AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT.
SECTION 12. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION
THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION ARE TO:
(A) OVERSEE AND MAINTAIN THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT;
(B) PROMULGATE RULES WHICH SHALL BE BINDING TO THE EXTENT AND IN
THE MANNER PROVIDED FOR IN THE COMPACT;
(C) ISSUE, UPON THE REQUEST OF A MEMBER STATE OR MEMBER BOARD,
ADVISORY OPINIONS CONCERNING THE MEETING OR INTERPRETATION OF THE
COMPACT, ITS BYLAWS, RULES, AND ACTIONS;
(D) ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH COMPACT PROVISIONS, THE RULES
PROMULGATED BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION, AND THE BYLAWS, USING ALL
NECESSARY AND PROPER MEANS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE USE OF
JUDICIAL PROCESS;
(E) ESTABLISH AND APPOINT COMMITTEES INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED
TO, AN EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 11, WHICH SHALL HAVE
THE POWER TO ACT ON BEHALF OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IN CARRYING
OUT ITS POWERS AND DUTIES;
(F) PAY, OR PROVIDE FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE EXPENSES RELATED TO
THE ESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION, AND ONGOING ACTIVITIES OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION;
– 13 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(G) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN ONE OR MORE OFFICES;
(H) BORROW, ACCEPT, HIRE, OR CONTRACT FOR SERVICES OF PERSONNEL;
(I) PURCHASE AND MAINTAIN INSURANCE AND BONDS;
(J) EMPLOY AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR WHO SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO
EMPLOY, SELECT, OR APPOINT EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AND CONSULTANTS, AND TO
DETERMINE THEIR QUALIFICATIONS, DEFINE THEIR DUTIES, AND FIX THEIR
COMPENSATION;
(K) ESTABLISH PERSONNEL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS RELATING TO
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST, RATES OF COMPENSATION, AND QUALIFICATION OF
PERSONNEL;
(L) ACCEPT DONATIONS AND GRANTS OF MONEY, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES,
MATERIALS, AND SERVICES AND TO RECEIVE, UTILIZE, AND DISPOSE OF IT IN A
MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE CONFLICT OF INTEREST POLICIES ESTABLISHED BY
THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION;
(M) LEASE, PURCHASE, ACCEPT CONTRIBUTIONS OR DONATIONS OF, OR
OTHERWISE TO OWN, HOLD, IMPROVE, OR USE ANY PROPERTY, REAL, PERSONAL, OR
MIXED;
(N) SELL, CONVEY, MORTGAGE, PLEDGE, LEASE, EXCHANGE, ABANDON, OR
OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF ANY PROPERTY, REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED;
(O) ESTABLISH A BUDGET AND MAKE EXPENDITURES;
(P) ADOPT A SEAL AND BYLAWS GOVERNING THE MANAGEMENT AND
OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION;
(Q) REPORT ANNUALLY TO THE LEGISLATURES AND GOVERNORS OF THE
MEMBER STATES CONCERNING THE ACTIVITIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
DURING THE PRECEDING YEAR. SUCH REPORTS SHALL ALSO INCLUDE REPORTS OF
FINANCIAL AUDITS, AND FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, AND ANY RECOMMENDATIONS
THAT MAY HAVE BEEN ADOPTED BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION;
(R) COORDINATE EDUCATION, TRAINING, AND PUBLIC AWARENESS
REGARDING THE COMPACT, ITS IMPLEMENTATION, AND ITS OPERATION;
(S) MAINTAIN RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE BYLAWS;
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
(T) SEEK AND OBTAIN TRADEMARKS, COPYRIGHTS, AND PATENTS; AND
(U) PERFORM SUCH FUNCTIONS AS MAY BE NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE
TO ACHIEVE THE PURPOSE OF THE COMPACT.
SECTION 13. FINANCE POWERS
(A) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION MAY LEVY ON AND COLLECT AN ANNUAL
ASSESSMENT FROM EACH MEMBER STATE TO COVER THE COST OF THE OPERATIONS
AND ACTIVITIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION AND ITS STAFF. THE TOTAL
ASSESSMENT MUST BE SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE ANNUAL BUDGET APPROVED
EACH YEAR FOR WHICH REVENUE IS NOT PROVIDED BY OTHER SOURCES. THE
AGGREGATE ANNUAL ASSESSMENT AMOUNT SHALL BE ALLOCATED UPON A
FORMULA TO BE DETERMINED BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION, WHICH SHALL
PROMULGATE A RULE BINDING UPON ALL MEMBER STATES.
(B) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION MAY NOT INCUR OBLIGATIONS OF ANY
KIND PRIOR TO SECURING THE FUNDS ADEQUATE TO MEET THE SAME.
(C) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION MAY NOT PLEDGE THE CREDIT OF ANY
OF THE MEMBER STATES, EXCEPT BY, AND WITH THE AUTHORITY OF, THE MEMBER
STATE.
(D) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL MAINTAIN FINANCIAL RECORDS
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE BYLAWS, INCLUDING PROFIT AND LOSS STATEMENTS
AND BALANCE SHEET REPORTS WHICH SHALL BE INCLUDED IN THE ANNUAL REPORT
OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
SECTION 14. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION
(A) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL, BY A MAJORITY OF
COMMISSIONERS PRESENT AND VOTING, ADOPT BYLAWS TO GOVERN ITS CONDUCT
AS MAY BE NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE
COMPACT WITHIN TWELVE MONTHS OF THE FIRST INTERSTATE COMMISSION
MEETING.
(B) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT OR APPOINT ANNUALLY
FROM AMONG ITS COMMISSIONERS, A CHAIRPERSON, A VICE–CHAIRPERSON, AND A
TREASURER, EACH OF WHOM SHALL HAVE SUCH AUTHORITY AND DUTIES AS MAY BE
SPECIFIED IN THE BYLAWS. THE CHAIRPERSON, OR IN THE CHAIRPERSON’S
ABSENCE OR DISABILITY, THE VICE–CHAIRPERSON, SHALL PRESIDE AT ALL
– 15 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
MEETINGS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
(C) OFFICERS SELECTED IN SUBSECTION (B) SHALL SERVE WITHOUT
REMUNERATION FOR THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
(D) THE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM SUIT AND LIABILITY, EITHER PERSONALLY OR IN THEIR
OFFICIAL CAPACITY, FOR A CLAIM FOR DAMAGE TO OR LOSS OF PROPERTY OR
PERSONAL INJURY OR OTHER CIVIL LIABILITY CAUSED OR ARISING OUT OF, OR
RELATING TO, AN ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED,
OR THAT SUCH PERSON HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED,
WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR
RESPONSIBILITIES; PROVIDED THAT SUCH PERSON MAY NOT BE PROTECTED FROM
SUIT OR LIABILITY FOR DAMAGE, LOSS, INJURY, OR LIABILITY CAUSED BY THE
INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL AND WANTON MISCONDUCT OF SUCH PERSON.
(E) THE LIABILITY OF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND EMPLOYEES OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION OR REPRESENTATIVES OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION, ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF SUCH PERSON’S EMPLOYMENT OR
DUTIES FOR ACTS, ERRORS, OR OMISSIONS OCCURRING WITHIN SUCH PERSON’S
STATE, MAY NOT EXCEED THE LIMITS OF LIABILITY SET FORTH UNDER THE
CONSTITUTION AND LAWS OF THAT STATE FOR STATE OFFICIALS, EMPLOYEES, AND
AGENTS. THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS CONSIDERED TO BE AN
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATES FOR THE PURPOSE OF SUCH ACTION. NOTHING
IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROTECT SUCH PERSON FROM SUIT
OR LIABILITY FOR DAMAGE, LOSS, INJURY, OR LIABILITY CAUSED BY THE
INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL AND WANTON MISCONDUCT OF SUCH PERSON.
(F) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL DEFEND THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR, ITS EMPLOYEES, AND SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OR OTHER APPROPRIATE LEGAL COUNSEL OF THE MEMBER STATE
REPRESENTED BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION REPRESENTATIVE, SHALL
DEFEND SUCH INTERSTATE COMMISSION REPRESENTATIVE IN ANY CIVIL ACTION
SEEKING TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF AN ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT,
ERROR OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF INTERSTATE
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT THE
DEFENDANT HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE
SCOPE OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR
RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR
OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL AND WANTON
MISCONDUCT ON THE PART OF SUCH PERSON.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
(G) TO THE EXTENT NOT COVERED BY THE STATE INVOLVED, MEMBER
STATE, OR THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION, THE REPRESENTATIVES OR EMPLOYEES
OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL BE HELD HARMLESS IN THE AMOUNT OF A
SETTLEMENT OR JUDGEMENT, INCLUDING ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS, OBTAINED
AGAINST SUCH PERSONS ARISING OUT OF AN ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR
OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT SUCH PERSONS HAD A
REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF INTERSTATE
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT THE
ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM
INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL AND WANTON MISCONDUCT ON THE PART OF SUCH
PERSON.
SECTION 15. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION
(A) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE RULES IN ORDER
TO EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY ACHIEVE THE PURPOSE OF THE COMPACT.
NOTWITHSTANDING THE FOREGOING, IN THE EVENT THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
EXERCISES ITS RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN A MANNER THAT IS BEYOND THE SCOPE
OF THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, OR THE POWERS GRANTED HEREUNDER, THEN
SUCH AN ACTION BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL BE INVALID AND HAVE
NO FORCE OR EFFECT.
(B) RULES DEEMED APPROPRIATE FOR THE OPERATIONS OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL BE MADE PURSUANT TO THE RULEMAKING
PROCESS THAT SUBSTANTIALLY CONFORMS TO THE “MODEL STATE
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT” OF 2010, AND SUBSEQUENT AMENDMENTS
THERETO.
(C) NOT LATER THAN THIRTY DAYS AFTER A RULE IS PROMULGATED, ANY
PERSON MAY FILE A PETITION FOR JUDICIAL REVIEW OF THE RULE IN THE UNITED
STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA OR THE FEDERAL
DISTRICT WHERE THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES,
PROVIDED THAT THE FILING OF SUCH A PETITION MAY NOT STAY OR OTHERWISE
PREVENT THE RULE FROM BECOMING EFFECTIVE UNLESS THE COURT FINDS THAT
THE PETITIONER HAS A SUBSTANTIAL LIKELIHOOD OF SUCCESS. THE COURT SHALL
GIVE DEFERENCE TO THE ACTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION CONSISTENT
WITH APPLICABLE LAW AND MAY NOT FIND THE RULE TO BE UNLAWFUL IF THE RULE
REPRESENTS A REASONABLE EXERCISE OF THE AUTHORITY GRANTED TO THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
SECTION 16. OVERSIGHT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT
– 17 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) THE EXECUTIVE, LEGISLATIVE, AND JUDICIAL BRANCHES OF STATE
GOVERNMENT IN EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL ENFORCE THE COMPACT AND SHALL
TAKE ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO EFFECTUATE THE
COMPACT’S PURPOSES AND INTENT. THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND THE
RULES PROMULGATED HEREUNDER SHALL HAVE STANDING AS STATUTORY LAW
BUT MAY NOT OVERRIDE EXISTING STATE AUTHORITY TO REGULATE THE PRACTICE
OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE.
(B) ALL COURTS SHALL TAKE JUDICIAL NOTICE OF THE COMPACT AND THE
RULES IN ANY JUDICIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING IN A MEMBER STATE
PERTAINING TO THE SUBJECT MATTER OF THE COMPACT WHICH MAY AFFECT THE
POWERS, RESPONSIBILITIES OR ACTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
(C) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE ALL
SERVICES OF PROCESS IN ANY SUCH PROCEEDING, AND SHALL HAVE STANDING TO
INTERVENE IN THE PROCEEDING FOR ALL PURPOSES. FAILURE TO PROVIDE
SERVICE OF PROCESS TO THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL RENDER
JUDGEMENT OR ORDER VOID AS TO THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION, THE COMPACT,
OR PROMULGATED RULES.
SECTION 17. ENFORCEMENT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT
(A) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION, IN THE REASONABLE EXERCISE OF ITS
DISCRETION, SHALL ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS AND RULES OF THE COMPACT.
(B) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION MAY, BY MAJORITY VOTE OF THE
COMMISSIONERS PRESENT AND VOTING, INITIATE LEGAL ACTION IN THE UNITED
STATES COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, OR, AT THE DISCRETION OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION, IN THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES, TO ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT, AND ITS PROMULGATED RULES AND BYLAWS,
AGAINST A MEMBER STATE IN DEFAULT. THE RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS
NECESSARY, THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH
LITIGATION INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(C) THE REMEDIES HEREIN MAY NOT BE THE EXCLUSIVE REMEDIES OF THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION. THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION MAY AVAIL ITSELF OF
ANY OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE UNDER STATE LAW OR REGULATION OF A
PROFESSION.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
SECTION 18. DEFAULT PROCEDURES
(A) THE GROUNDS FOR DEFAULT INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO,
FAILURE OF A MEMBER BOARD TO PERFORM SUCH OBLIGATIONS OR
RESPONSIBILITIES IMPOSED UPON IT BY THE COMPACT, OR THE RULES AND
BYLAWS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION PROMULGATED UNDER THE COMPACT.
(B) IF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A MEMBER STATE
HAS DEFAULTED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS OR RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THE COMPACT, OR THE BYLAWS OR PROMULGATED RULES, THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEFAULTING STATE AND
OTHER MEMBER STATES, OF THE NATURE OF THE DEFAULT, THE MEANS OF CURING
THE DEFAULT, AND ANY ACTION TAKEN BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION. THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL SPECIFY THE CONDITIONS BY WHICH THE
DEFAULTING STATE MUST CURE ITS DEFAULT; AND
(2) PROVIDE REMEDIAL TRAINING AND SPECIFIC TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE REGARDING THE DEFAULT.
(C) IF THE DEFAULTING STATE FAILS TO CURE THE DEFAULT, THE
DEFAULTING STATE SHALL BE TERMINATED FROM THE COMPACT UPON AN
AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF THE MAJORITY OF THE COMMISSIONERS PRESENT AND
VOTING, AND ALL RIGHTS, PRIVILEGES, AND BENEFITS CONFERRED BY THE
COMPACT SHALL TERMINATE ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION. A CURE
OF THE DEFAULT DOES NOT RELIEVE THE OFFENDING STATE OF OBLIGATIONS OR
LIABILITIES INCURRED DURING THE PERIOD OF DEFAULT.
(D) TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT SHALL BE IMPOSED
ONLY AFTER ALL OTHER MEANS OF SECURING COMPLIANCE HAVE BEEN
EXHAUSTED. NOTICE OF INTENT TO TERMINATE SHALL BE GIVEN BY THE
INTERSTATE COMMISSION TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAJORITY AND MINORITY
LEADERS OF THE DEFAULTING STATE’S LEGISLATURE, AND EACH OF THE MEMBER
STATES.
(E) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH RULES AND
PROCEDURES TO ADDRESS LICENSES AND PODIATRISTS THAT ARE MATERIALLY
IMPACTED BY THE TERMINATION OF A MEMBER STATE, OR THE WITHDRAWAL OF A
MEMBER STATE.
(F) THE MEMBER STATE WHICH HAS BEEN TERMINATED IS RESPONSIBLE
FOR ALL DUES, OBLIGATIONS, AND LIABILITIES INCURRED THROUGH THE
– 19 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION INCLUDING OBLIGATIONS, THE PERFORMANCE
OF WHICH EXTENDS BEYOND THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION.
(G) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION MAY NOT BEAR ANY COSTS RELATING TO
ANY STATE THAT HAS BEEN FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT OR WHICH HAS BEEN
TERMINATED FROM THE COMPACT, UNLESS OTHERWISE MUTUALLY AGREED UPON
IN WRITING BETWEEN THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION AND THE DEFAULTING STATE.
(H) THE DEFAULTING STATE MAY APPEAL THE ACTION OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION BY PETITIONING THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES. THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE
AWARDED ALL COSTS OF LITIGATION INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
SECTION 19. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
(A) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL ATTEMPT, UPON THE REQUEST
OF A MEMBER STATE, TO RESOLVE DISPUTES WHICH ARE SUBJECT TO THE COMPACT
AND WHICH ARISE AMONG MEMBER STATES OR MEMBER BOARDS.
(B) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE RULES
PROVIDING FOR BOTH MEDIATION AND BINDING DISPUTE RESOLUTION AS
APPROPRIATE.
SECTION 20. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE, AND
AMENDMENT
(A) ANY STATE IS ELIGIBLE TO BECOME A MEMBER OF THE COMPACT.
(B) THE COMPACT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING UPON
LEGISLATIVE ENACTMENT OF THE COMPACT INTO LAW BY NO LESS THAN FOUR
STATES. THEREAFTER, IT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING ON A STATE
UPON ENACTMENT OF THE COMPACT INTO LAW BY THAT STATE.
(C) THE GOVERNORS OF NON–MEMBER STATES, OR THEIR DESIGNEES,
SHALL BE WELCOME TO PARTICIPATE IN THE ACTIVITIES OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION ON A NON–VOTING BASIS PRIOR TO ADOPTION OF THE COMPACT BY
ALL STATES.
(D) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION MAY PROPOSE AMENDMENTS TO THE
COMPACT FOR ENACTMENT BY THE MEMBER STATES. NO AMENDMENT SHALL
BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING UPON THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION AND OTHER
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
MEMBER STATES UNLESS AND UNTIL IT IS ENACTED INTO LAW BY UNANIMOUS
CONSENT OF THE MEMBER STATES.
SECTION 21. WITHDRAWAL
(A) ONCE EFFECTIVE, THE COMPACT SHALL CONTINUE IN FORCE AND
REMAIN BINDING UPON EACH AND EVERY MEMBER STATE; PROVIDED THAT A
MEMBER STATE MAY WITHDRAW FROM THE COMPACT BY SPECIFICALLY REPEALING
THE STATUTE WHICH ENACTED THE COMPACT INTO LAW.
(B) WITHDRAWAL FROM THE COMPACT SHALL BE BY THE ENACTMENT OF A
STATUTE REPEALING THE SAME, BUT MAY NOT TAKE EFFECT UNTIL ONE YEAR
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF SUCH STATUTE AND UNTIL WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE
WITHDRAWAL HAS BEEN GIVEN BY THE WITHDRAWING STATE TO THE GOVERNOR OF
EACH OTHER MEMBER STATE.
(C) THE WITHDRAWING STATE SHALL IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY THE
CHAIRPERSON OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IN WRITING UPON THE
INTRODUCTION OF LEGISLATION REPEALING THE COMPACT IN THE WITHDRAWING
STATE.
(D) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION MAY NOTIFY THE OTHER MEMBER
STATES OF THE WITHDRAWING STATE’S INTENT TO WITHDRAW WITHIN SIXTY DAYS
OF ITS RECEIPT OF NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C).
(E) THE WITHDRAWING STATE IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL DUES,
OBLIGATIONS AND LIABILITIES INCURRED THROUGHOUT THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
WITHDRAWAL, INCLUDING OBLIGATIONS, THE PERFORMANCE OF WHICH EXTEND
BEYOND THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF WITHDRAWAL.
(F) REINSTATEMENT FOLLOWING WITHDRAWAL OF A MEMBER STATE
SHALL OCCUR UPON THE WITHDRAWING STATE REENACTING THE COMPACT OR
UPON SUCH LATER DATE AS DETERMINED BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION.
(G) THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION IS AUTHORIZED TO DEVELOP RULES TO
ADDRESS THE IMPACT OF THE WITHDRAWAL OF A MEMBER STATE ON LICENSES
GRANTED IN OTHER MEMBER STATES TO PODIATRISTS WHO DESIGNATED THE
WITHDRAWING MEMBER STATE AS THE STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE.
SECTION 22. DISSOLUTION
(A) THE COMPACT SHALL BE DISSOLVED EFFECTIVE UPON THE DATE OF
THE WITHDRAWAL OR DEFAULT OF THE MEMBER STATE WHICH REDUCES THE
– 21 –

Ch. 70 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMPACT TO ONE MEMBER STATE.
(B) UPON THE DISSOLUTION OF THE COMPACT, THE COMPACT BECOMES
NULL AND VOID AND SHALL BE OF NO FURTHER FORCE OR EFFECT, AND THE
BUSINESS AND AFFAIRS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION SHALL BE CONCLUDED,
AND SURPLUS FUNDS SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE BYLAWS.
SECTION 23. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION
(A) THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT SHALL BE SEVERABLE, AND IF ANY
PHRASE, CLAUSE, SENTENCE, OR PROVISION IS DEEMED UNENFORCEABLE, THE
REMAINING PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT SHALL BE ENFORCEABLE.
(B) THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED
TO EFFECTUATE ITS PURPOSES.
(C) NOTHING IN THE COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THE
APPLICABILITY OF OTHER INTERSTATE COMPACTS TO WHICH THE MEMBER STATES
ARE MEMBERS.
SECTION 24. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
(A) NOTHING HEREIN PREVENTS THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY OTHER LAW
OF A MEMBER STATE THAT IS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THE COMPACT.
(B) ALL LAWS IN A MEMBER STATE IN CONFLICT WITH THE COMPACT ARE
SUPERSEDED TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
(C) ALL LAWFUL ACTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION, INCLUDING
ALL RULES AND BYLAWS PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION, ARE BINDING UPON
ALL MEMBER STATES.
(D) ALL AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION AND THE
MEMBER STATES ARE BINDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR TERMS.
(E) IN THE EVENT THAT ANY PROVISION OF THE COMPACT EXCEEDS THE
CONSTITUTIONAL LIMITS IMPOSED ON THE LEGISLATURE OF ANY MEMBER STATE,
SUCH PROVISION SHALL BE INEFFECTIVE TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT WITH
THE CONSTITUTIONAL PROVISION IN QUESTION IN THAT MEMBER STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is contingent on the
enacting of substantially similar legislation in four other states. The Maryland Department
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 70
of Health shall notify the Department of Legislative Services within 10 days after four
states have enacted legislation that is substantially similar to this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 23 –